Illinois, session 104th, HB4862.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 510-20.88 and 34-18.88 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.88 new)7    Sec. 10-20.88. Staff mental health support. By January 1, 82028, each school board must develop a procedure that, at a 9minimum, incorporates all of the following elements:10        (1) A commitment to support employee mental health in 11    the workplace.12        (2) Opportunities for staff to provide feedback, 13    including anonymous feedback, on employee mental health. 14    This may include existing feedback opportunities, 15    including, but not limited to, staff meetings or the 16    annual survey of learning conditions under Section 17    2-3.153.18        (3) At a minimum, an annual communication to school 19    district personnel that is included in the employee 20    handbook or another readily accessible format if no 21    handbook exists and that provides information on the 22    mental health resources and support available to staff, 23    such as resources available from the State Board of   HB4862 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17059 LNS 30474 b1    Education, the Department of Human Services, or any other 2    resource the school district determines addresses the 3    needs of staff, as well as a description of district-level 4    support to employees related to mental health, if 5    available.6        (4) Opportunities for the school board to receive 7    information regarding employee mental health initiatives 8    and programs, which may include reports to the school 9    board or communications from the superintendent to the 10    school board. 11    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.88 new)12    Sec. 34-18.88. Staff mental health support. By January 1, 132028, the board must develop a procedure that, at a minimum, 14incorporates all of the following elements:15        (1) A commitment to support employee mental health in 16    the workplace.17        (2) Opportunities for staff to provide feedback, 18    including anonymous feedback, on employee mental health. 19    This may include existing feedback opportunities, 20    including, but not limited to, staff meetings or the 21    annual survey of learning conditions under Section 22    2-3.153.23        (3) At a minimum, an annual communication to school 24    district personnel that is included in the employee 25    handbook or another readily accessible format if no   HB4862 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17059 LNS 30474 b1    handbook exists and that provides information on the 2    mental health resources and support available to staff, 3    such as resources available from the State Board of 4    Education, the Department of Human Services, or any other 5    resource the school district determines addresses the 6    needs of staff, as well as a description of district-level 7    support to employees related to mental health, if 8    available.9        (4) Opportunities for the board to receive information 10    regarding employee mental health initiatives and programs, 11    which may include reports to the board or communications 12    from the general superintendent of schools to the board.